North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 2A. Garnishment for Debts Owed Public Hospitals. [Repealed]

§§ 131E-48 through 131E-51.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-382, s. 13.2, effective October 1, 2013, and applicable to hospital and ambulatory surgical facility billings and collections practices occurring on or after that date.

History.

S. 131E-48; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 880, s. 1; repealed by 2013-382, s. 13.2, effective October 1, 2013. s. 131E-49; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 880, s. 1; repealed by 2013-382, s. 13.2, effective October 1, 2013. s. 131E-50; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 880, s. 1; repealed by 2013-382, s. 13.2, effective October 1, 2013. s. 131E-51; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 880, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 36; repealed by 2013-382, s. 13.2, effective October 1, 2013.

§§ 131E-52 through 131E-54.

Reserved for future codification purposes.